California, session 20252026, SB1129.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 6229 is added to the Business and Professions Code, immediately following Section 6228, to read:6229. (a) After the State Bar solicits public comment on the Proposed California Rules of Court Rule 9.45.1 to Establish a Community Justice Worker program, as required by Administrative Order 2026-06-17-01 of the Supreme Court of California, the State Bar shall, at the time it resubmits the proposal to the Supreme Court of California, transmit to the Assembly and Senate Committees on Judiciary a report specifying any statutory changes the State Bar believes are necessary to implement the California Community Justice Worker Program.(b) (1) The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2031.SECTION 1.Section 6229 is added to the Business and Professions Code, immediately following Section 6228, to read:6229.(a)The State Bar shall create a working group to examine the results of community justice worker models in other states and jurisdictions.(b)The working group shall examine the impact of community justice worker models in providing legal services to those who qualify for legal assistance from legal services organizations, to low-income individuals, and to people who otherwise would not have received legal services.(c)The State Bar shall submit, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, a report with findings and recommendations to the Senate Committee on Judiciary, the Assembly Committee on Judiciary, and the California Supreme Court before January 1, 2029.